Massachusetts, session 194th, S1814.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Paragraph (B) of subdivision (1) of Section 13 of Chapter 32 of the General Laws shall
be amended by adding the following after the words “allowance becomes effective.”, the
following words: - “In the event circumstances beyond the retirement board’s control prevent the
calculation of the full monthly payment by the first such full payment date, the retirement board
shall pay 90% of its estimated full monthly payment until such time as the circumstances beyond
the retirement board’s control are corrected. On an annual basis, the retirement board will notify
the House and the Senate of all circumstances beyond the retirement board’s control that
prevented the calculation of the full monthly payment by the first such full payment date.”
of 1